Utah statutes.
54-8b-8.   Antitrust and restraint of trade laws not affected by chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall in any way preempt, modify, exempt, abrogate, or otherwise affect any right, cause of action, liability, duty, or obligation arising from any federal, state, or local law governing unfair business practices or antitrust, restraint of trade, or other anti-competitive activity.

